Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.260

Washington professional educator standards board—Cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice.

(1) The Washington professional educator standards board shall:

(a) Develop or update cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice for preparation, continuing education, and other training of school district staff;

(b) Collaborate with the Washington state school directors' association to compare and align the standards of practice developed under (a) of this subsection with the standards of governance developed under RCW 28A.345.115. The review must include the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee and may include the office of equity established under RCW 43.06D.020; and

(c) Post on its public website the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice for school district staff.

(2) The Washington professional educator standards board shall develop and periodically update rubrics to evaluate the alignment of training and professional development programs and related materials with the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice for school district staff developed under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) By November 1, 2030, and every 10 years thereafter, the Washington professional educator standards board shall review the definitions in RCW 28A.415.443 and the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice for school district staff developed under subsection (1) of this section and report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature any recommendations for revising the definitions in RCW 28A.415.443.

(4) For purposes of this section, "cultural competency," "diversity," "equity," and "inclusion" have the same meaning as in RCW 28A.415.443.

[ 2021 c 197 s 4; 2009 c 468 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.

Findings—Intent—2009 c 468: See note following RCW 28A.300.136.